Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 13
COMPLEMENTARY AND ALTERNATIVE MEDICINE
FOR A PERSON WITH A SPINAL CORD INJURY

25.5-6-1301. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that:

A person with a spinal cord injury could benefit from complementary and alternative medicine such as chiropractic care, massage therapy, or acupuncture; and

Complementary and alternative medicine could improve the quality of life and help reduce the need for continuous or more expensive procedures, medications, and hospitalizations for a person with a spinal cord injury and could allow a person with a spinal cord injury to be employed.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added, (HB 09-1047), ch. 395, p. 2128 § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (SB 15-011), ch. 333, p. 1354, § 1, effective June 5.

25.5-6-1302. Definitions.

As used in this part 13, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Complementary or alternative medicine" means a form of diverse health-care services not provided for under this article or article 4 or 5 of this title prior to August 5, 2009, but authorized by the rules of the state board adopted pursuant to section 25.5-6-1303 (4). The medicine is limited to chiropractic care, massage therapy, and acupuncture performed by licensed or certified providers.

"Eligible person with a disability" means a person with a disability who meets the eligibility criteria specified in section 25.5-6-1303 (2)(b).

"Pilot program" means the pilot program authorized pursuant to section 25.5-6-1303 to allow an eligible person with a disability to receive complementary and alternative medicine.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added, (HB 09-1047), ch. 395, p. 2128, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2015:

(1) and (3) amended, (SB 15-011), ch. 333, p. 1354, § 2, effective June 5.

Cross references:

For additional definitions applicable to this part 13, see § 25.5-4-103.

25.5-6-1303. Pilot program - complementary or alternative medicine - rules.

The general assembly authorizes the state department to implement a pilot program that would allow an eligible person with a disability to receive complementary or alternative medicine to the extent authorized by federal waiver. The pilot program may begin no later than January 1, 2012. The state department shall design and implement the pilot program with input from an advisory committee that must include, but need not be limited to, persons with spinal cord injuries who are receiving complementary or alternative medicine. The state department may seek any federal waivers that may be necessary to implement this part 13.

Subject to available funds, it is the intent of the general assembly that the state department enroll every eligible person that applies for the waiver and that an eligible person is not placed on a waiting list for services.

The purpose of the pilot program is to expand the choice of therapies available to eligible persons with disabilities, to study the success of complementary and alternative medicine, and to produce an overall cost savings for the state compared to the estimated expenditures that would have otherwise been spent for the same persons with spinal cord injuries absent the pilot program.

In order to qualify and to remain eligible for the pilot program authorized by this section, a person shall:

Be diagnosed with a primary condition of a spinal cord injury, multiple sclerosis, a brain injury, spina bifida, muscular dystrophy, or cerebral palsy, with the total inability for independent ambulation directly resulting from one of these diagnoses;

Be willing to participate in the pilot program;

Demonstrate a current need, as further defined in rule by the state board, for complementary or alternative medicine; and

Be eligible for medicaid, including but not limited to persons who meet the functional level of care and financial criteria described in rules promulgated by the state board relating to long-term care services.

The state department shall implement subsection (2)(b) of this section no later than July 1, 2022.

The pilot program is available to all eligible individuals in Colorado.

The state department shall develop the accountability requirements for the pilot program necessary to safeguard the use of public moneys and to promote effective and efficient service delivery.

The state board shall adopt rules as necessary for the implementation and administration of the pilot program.

The state department shall cause to be conducted an independent evaluation of the pilot program to be completed no later than January 1, 2025. The state department shall provide a report of the evaluation to the health and human services committee of the senate and the public health care and human services committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees. The report on the evaluation must include the following:

The number of eligible persons with disabilities participating in the pilot program;

The cost-effectiveness of the pilot program;

Feedback from consumers and the state department concerning the progress and success of the pilot program;

Any changes to the health status or health outcomes of the persons participating in the pilot program;

Other information relevant to the success and problems of the pilot program; and

Recommendations concerning the feasibility of continuing the pilot program beyond the pilot stage and changes, if any, that are needed.

Repealed.

Unless the state department receives sufficient appropriations, the state department is not required to seek federal approval or implement the pilot program.

No later than January 2024, the state department shall submit a report to the senate health and human services committee, the house of representatives public and behavioral health and human services committee, and the house of representatives health and insurance committee, or any successor committees, as part of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" presentation required by section 2-7-203. At a minimum, the report must identify:

A reimbursement system with a goal to incentivize and increase transportation provider participation;

How the state department will ensure compliance with applicable federal laws and waiver requirements;

A system of common reporting to ensure a recipient does not exceed the medicaid benefit in a multi-provider scenario; and

Best practices based on what other states have done to allow transportation network companies to provide nonmedical transportation services for individuals receiving services, including but not limited to, reimbursement rates; driver compensation; and integration with programs that provide nonmedical transportation services.

In developing the report, the state department shall engage in a stakeholder process that includes individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities and their families, individuals with disabilities, and transportation network companies. The report may be developed in conjunction with the reporting requirement in sections 25.5-6-307 (6), 25.5-6-409 (6), 25.5-6-606 (9), and 25.5-6-704 (8).

Upon completion of the report described in subsection (8)(a) of this section, the state department shall analyze and review each operational transportation network company, as defined in section 40-10.1-602 (3). The state department shall verify each transportation network company's viability to ensure the health, safety, welfare, cost effectiveness, and capability in expanding nonmedical transportation services for individuals receiving services pursuant to this section and comply with all rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (8)(e)(I) of this section.

No later than July 1, 2024, the state department shall authorize verified transportation network companies to provide nonmedical transportation services if the state department finds the transportation network company viable under federal requirements and within budgetary constraints.

For the purposes of this subsection (8)(c), "verify" means a transportation network company meets all requirements resulting from the report described in subsection (8)(a) of this section.

The state department may seek any necessary federal authorization for the implementation of this subsection (8).

The state department shall promulgate any necessary rules to ensure transportation network companies comply with federal and state oversight requirements and shall include all relevant stakeholders, including medicaid recipients, transportation network companies, current providers and drivers for nonmedical transportation services, and other interested parties in the development of such requirements.

Pursuant to section 40-10.1-105 (1)(l), transportation network companies are not subject to regulation by the public utilities commission when providing nonmedical transportation services pursuant to this section and are instead subject to rules promulgated by the state department pursuant to this subsection (8)(e).

This subsection (8) does not apply to a provider authorized to provide transportation services pursuant to part 8 of article 1 of title 25.5 prior to August 10, 2022.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added, (HB 09-1047), ch. 395, p. 2129, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2015:

(1), (2)(a), (2)(b)(III), (5), and (7) amended and (6) repealed, (SB 15-011), ch. 333, p. 1355, § 3, effective June 5.

L. 2019:

IP(5) amended, (SB 19-197), ch. 335, p. 3089, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2021:

(1)(a) and (2)(b) amended and (2)(c) and (2)(d) added, (SB 21-038), ch. 404, p. 2684, § 1, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(8) added, (HB 22-1114), ch. 396, p. 2821, § 6, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1114, see section 1 of chapter 396, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

25.5-6-1304. Repeal of part.

This part 13 is repealed, effective September 1, 2025.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added, (HB 09-1047), ch. 395, p. 2130, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (SB 15-011), ch. 333, p. 1356, § 4, effective June 5.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-197), ch. 335, p. 3089, § 2, effective May 29.